Arkansas, session 2025, SB636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings — Nonseverability.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and funding
for a state agency or institution each fiscal year is the prerogative of the
General Assembly;
(2) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and funding
for a state agency or institution is usually accomplished by delineating the
maximum amounts in the appropriation acts for the state agency or
institution, authorizing the distribution of unobligated funds, and in the
general revenue allocations authorized for each relevant fund and fund
account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.;
*KMW054*
04/09/2025 3:00:49 PM KMW054

SB636
(3) The Restricted Reserve Fund has established procedures for
the transfer of funds to various funds and fund accounts for the efficient
and effective operation of state government; and
(4) It is necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or,
if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as
provided in § 19-5-1263(c).
(b) The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or if the
General Assembly is in session the Joint Budget Committee, is not a severable
part of § 19-5-1263. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or if the General Assembly is in session the Joint Budget Committee,
is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, § 19-5-1263
(c)(d) and (e) are void in their entirety.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TRANSFERS TO THE RESTRICTED RESERVE FUND.
Immediately upon the effective date of this Act, as soon thereafter as is
practical or as authorized in this Section the State Treasurer shall transfer
and credit to the "Restricted Reserve Fund”, upon certification of the
amounts thereof by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the following:
(a)(1) All unobligated monies in the EBD or Contingency Set-Aside in the
Restricted Reserve Fund as established in Section 3(a)(19) of Act 561 of
2023;
(2) All unobligated monies in the Adequacy Set-Aside in the
Restricted Reserve Fund as established in Section 3(b)(3) of Act 561 of 2023;
(3) All unobligated monies in the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs
Act Grants Matching Set-Aside as established in Section 3(a)(4) of Act 561 of
2023; and
(4) All unobligated monies in the Law Enforcement Stipends Set-Aside
in the Restricted Reserve Fund as established in Section 3(a)(27);
(b) All unobligated and unallocated monies remaining in the
“Development and Enhancement Fund” on June 30, 2025 which are not required to
finance projects to be financed therefrom pursuant to appropriations enacted
by the General Assembly, or which have not been reappropriated or reallocated
for financing from the “Development and Enhancement Fund” by the 95th General
Assembly;
(c)(1) All General Revenue Funds recovered from remaining fund balances
04/09/2025 3:00:49 PM KMW054

SB636
in the "General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund" from monies accruing thereto
during the 2023-2024 fiscal year which are not required to finance enactments
of the 95th General Assembly that do not expire on June 30, 2024, including
all General Revenue Funds recovered from remaining fund balances;
(2) Any unobligated or unallocated funds remaining on July 2, 2025 in
the "General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund" which are not required to
finance enactments of the 95th General Assembly that do not expire on June
30, 2025, including all General Revenue Funds recovered from remaining fund
balances;
(3) All General Revenue Funds recovered from remaining fund balances
in the "General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund" which are not required to
finance enactments of the 95th General Assembly that do not expire on June
30, 2026, including all General Revenue Funds recovered from remaining fund
balances;
(d) Those special revenues credited to the Development and Enhancement
Fund from estate taxes as set out in Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(171); and
(e) Other revenues as may be transferred or authorized by law.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. TRANSFERS, RESTRICTED RESERVE FUND
DISTRIBUTION AND SET-ASIDES. After having made transfers as authorized in
this Act, and after having transferred or set-aside the obligations as set
out in §19-5-202(b)(2)(B)(iii) as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for those funds transferred and credited to the Restricted Reserve
Fund as authorized in Section 2 of this Act, and that are unobligated for
other Set-Asides established by the General Assembly, the State Treasurer
shall transfer funds or establish sub-fund set-asides, or transfer funds to
existing sub-fund set-asides in the Restricted Reserve Fund, referred to and
established as "Set-Asides" in the Restrict Reserve fund herein, which shall
be funded as funds are available:
(a) Set-Aside four hundred thirty-six million seven hundred ninety-four
thousand four hundred thirty-three dollars ($436,794,433) or so much as is
available for the "Restricted Reserve Fund Set-Asides" as enumerated in
subsections (a)(2) through (a)(12) of this section, not inclusive of funds
authorized in subsection (a)(1) that is to be transferred effective upon
passage and approval of this Act, for purpose as set out in each Set-Aside,
to be funded in the following order;
04/09/2025 3:00:49 PM KMW054

SB636
(1) For a fund transfer upon the effective date of this subsection, the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her books and
those of the State Treasurer and the Auditor of the State the sum of one
hundred and thirty-six million dollars ($136,000,000) from the General
Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund to the State Captive Insurance Program Trust
Fund;
(2) Medicaid Sustainability Set-Aside, for the Department of Human
Services for transfers from time to time as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State for Medicaid Expenses, as authorized in 19-5-1263 (c),
in a sum not to exceed $100,000,000;
(3) Children's Educational Freedom Account Set-Aside, for the Department
of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, for transfers
from time to time to the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account
Fund, as authorized in 19-5-1263 (c), in a sum not to exceed $90,000,000;
(4)(A) Various General Discretionary Majority Vote Set-Aside, for
transfers from time to time as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, in a sum not to exceed $45,994,433;
(B) Funds transferred to the Various General Discretionary Majority
Vote Set-Aside herein shall be in addition to those remaining balances
currently available as established in Section 3(a)(18) of Act 561 of 2023 and
any other funds made available by the General Assembly;
(C) Notwithstanding other provisions of law as set out in 19-5-1263(c)
the Various General Discretionary Majority Vote Set-Aside authorized in
subsections (a)(4) herein shall only require a majority affirmative vote as
set out in the rules of the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee
during a legislative session of the General Assembly for prior approval of
all disbursements;
(5)(A) Educational Facilities Set-Aside, for the Department of Education -
Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation, Educational
Facilities Partnership Fund Account, Academic Facilities Partnership Program,
as authorized in 19-5-1263 (c), in a sum not to exceed $45,000,000;
(B) Funds transferred to the Educational Facilities Set-Aside herein
shall be in addition to those remaining balances currently available as
established in Section 3(a)(1) of Act 561 of 2023 and any other funds made
available by the General Assembly;
(C) All funds held in the Educational Facilities Set-Aside in the
04/09/2025 3:00:49 PM KMW054

SB636
Restricted Reserve Fund shall be invested and reinvested at the direction of
the State Board of Finance to maximize returns using any investments
authorized for use by the Treasurer of State; and Interest Earnings or other
earnings on moneys in the fund shall be allocated and retained in addition to
existing balances in the Educational Facilities Set-Aside;
(6)(A) Teacher Academy Scholarship Set-Aside, for the Department of
Education - Division of Higher Education, for transfers from time to time for
the Arkansas Teacher Academy Scholarship Program Fund, as authorized in 19-5-
1263 (c), in a sum not to exceed $12,000,000;
(B) Funds transferred to the Teacher Academy Scholarship Set-Aside
herein shall be in addition to those remaining balances currently available
as established in Sections 3(a)(8) and 3(b)(4) of Act 561 of 2023 and any
other funds made available by the General Assembly;
(7)(A) Motor Vehicle Set-Aside, for transfers from time to time as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, as authorized in 19-5-
1263 (c), in a sum not to exceed $4,700,000;
(B) Funds transferred to the Motor Vehicle Set-Aside herein shall be in
addition to those remaining balances currently available as established in
Sections 3(a)(9) of Act 561 of 2023 and any other funds made available by the
General Assembly;
(8) Economic Stimulus Programs Set-Aside, for transfers from time to time
to the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Economic Development Commission to
fund or fund accounts as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
for Site Infrastructure Grants and Economic Stimulus Activities throughout
the state, as authorized in 19-5-1263 (c), in a sum not to exceed
$50,000,000;
(9) Arkansas School for the Deaf/Blind Set-Aside, for transfers from time
to time as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, as authorized
in 19-5-1263 (c), in a sum not to exceed $35,000,000;
(10) State Capitol HVAC Upgrade Set-Aside, for the Secretary of State, for
transfers from time to time as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, as authorized in 19-5-1263 (c), in a sum not to exceed $9,100,000;
(11) For a transfer upon the effective date of this subsection, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her books and those of
the State Treasurer and the Auditor of the State the sum of twenty-five
million dollars ($25,000,000) to the Economic Development Incentive Quick
04/09/2025 3:00:49 PM KMW054

SB636
Action Closing Fund, for the Department of Commerce – Arkansas Economic
Development Commission; and
(12) For a transfer upon the effective date of this subsection, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her books and those of
the State Treasurer and the Auditor of the State the sum of twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000) to the Arkansas Major Historic Rehabilitation Trust
Fund, for the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Division of
Arkansas Heritage.
(b) After all the disbursements, transfers, or funds deposited in Restricted
Reserve Fund Set-Aside sub-funds as authorized in this Act, other enactments
by the General Assembly for Restricted Reserve Fund Set-Asides or transfers
out of the Restricted Reserve Fund to Fund or Fund Accounts are completed,
any remaining unobligated balances, future collections, deposits, and
transfers authorized in Section 2 of this Act shall be transferred and
credited to the General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 19-5-905(a)(12), concerning the uses of the
Securities Reserve Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(12) After all distributions and transfers under this section,
less one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) under § 19-3-521(a)(2), for a
transfer by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State on the last business day of
the fiscal year for that fiscal year of the fund balances to the Catastrophic
Reserve Fund shall be held in a sub-fund as necessary to be distributed as
follows:
(A) On September 1, 2025:
(i) After any other transfers authorized by the
General Assembly, the lesser of the remaining fund balance or twenty-five
million dollars ($25,000,000) to the Water and Sewer Treatment Facilities
Grant Program Fund; and
(ii) Any remaining fund balance after the transfer
under subdivision (a)(12)(A)(i) of this section to the General Revenue
Allotment Reserve Fund;
(B) On July 2, 2026:
(i) After any other transfers authorized by the
General Assembly, the lesser of the remaining fund balance or twenty-five
million dollars ($25,000,000) to the Water and Sewer Treatment Facilities
04/09/2025 3:00:49 PM KMW054

SB636
Grant Program Fund; and
(ii) Any remaining fund balance after the transfer
under subdivision (a)(12)(B)(i) of this section to the General Revenue
Allotment Reserve Fund; and
(C) On July 1, 2027:
(i) After any other transfers authorized by the
General Assembly, the lesser of the remaining fund balance or twenty-five
million dollars ($25,000,000) to the Water and Sewer Treatment Facilities
Grant Program Fund; and
(ii) Any remaining fund balance after the transfer
under subdivision (a)(12)(C)(i) of this section to the General Revenue
Allotment Reserve Fund; and
(D) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2028,
on the last business day of the fiscal year the remaining fund balance to the
General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund.

SECTION 5. DO NOT CODIFY. Conditions and Audit. (a) Transfer of funds
from the "Restricted Reserve Fund" shall be made only after the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State has determined that all criteria or pre-conditions
established in the appropriation act to receive the transfer have been met
and that a Method of Finance has been filed with the Office of Accounting in
the Department of Finance and Administration, if required.
(b) Any matching funds as may be provided in law shall be certified to
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State prior to the commencement of the
project.
(c) Any recipient of the funds appropriated herein are also subject to
an audit by the Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee in order to determine that the use of the funds was in compliance
with the intent and appropriated purposes of the General Assembly.

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. Funding Authority. (a) Any enactment of the
95th General Assembly in either regular, fiscal or extraordinary session
appropriating, transferring or allocating funds to the "Restricted Reserve
Fund" may be deemed to be payable from the "Restricted Reserve Fund".
(b) Appropriations which are not enumerated in this Act may be
financed from monies accruing to the "Restricted Reserve Fund" to fund
04/09/2025 3:00:49 PM KMW054

SB636
appropriations authorized by the General Assembly and as set out in law.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to allow transfers
which can provide an additional funding mechanism for the operation of state
departments, agencies and institutions of higher education, as well as to
address unforeseen needs of the state through the disbursement of state funds
with the Restricted Reserve Fund as authorized in this Act; with the
exception that Section 3 Subsection (a)(1) and Section 4 in this Act shall be
in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval,
and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in
the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025, with the exception that
Section 3 Subsection (a)(1) and Section 4 in this Act shall be in full force
and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval, could work
irreparable harm upon the proper the proper transfer of funds, administration
and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is
hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force
and effect from and after July 1, 2025; with the exception that Section 3
Subsection (a)(1) and Section 4 in this Act shall be in full force and effect
from and after the date of its passage and approval.













04/09/2025 3:00:49 PM KMW054